Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 4 Foreign Conservator

29-3-115.
“Foreign conservator” defined; sale of minor’s property.

For purposes of this part, a “foreign conservator” is a conservator or other person who has been given responsibility by a court of competent jurisdiction in another state or territory governed by the Constitution of the United States for the care of the property of a minor and whose conservatorship has not been transferred to and accepted in this state pursuant to the provisions of Part 2 of this article.

Any foreign conservator of a minor who resides in any other state and who is authorized to sell and convey property of the minor may sell property of the minor which is in this state, under the rules and regulations prescribed for the sale of real estate by conservators of this state, provided that the foreign conservator must file and have recorded in the court or other proper court, at the time of petitioning for sale, an authenticated copy of the letters of appointment and must also file with the court or other proper authority bond with good and sufficient security, in double the value of the property to be sold, for the faithful execution of the conservatorship, as provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-115

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-116.
Right of foreign conservator to bring action.

A foreign conservator may institute an action in any court in this state to enforce any right or to recover any property belonging to the minor or accruing to the foreign conservator in his or her capacity as conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-116

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-117.
Filing of letters of conservatorship.

Pending an action brought by a foreign conservator pursuant to Code Section 29-3-116, an authenticated copy of the letters of conservatorship shall be filed with the clerk of the court to become a part of the record if the case is pending in a court of record, or filed with the papers if the action is a summary proceeding.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-117

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-118.
Submission of foreign conservator to jurisdiction.

A foreign conservator submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in any proceeding relating to the conservatorship by:

Receiving payment of money or taking delivery of personal property in this state belonging to the minor; or

Doing any act as a conservator in this state that would have given this state jurisdiction over the conservator as an individual.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-118

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-119.
Rights of interested parties prior to sale of minor’s assets.

Any resident of this state who is interested as a creditor, heir, or will beneficiary of a minor whom a foreign conservator represents may apply to the proper court to compel the foreign conservator to protect his or her interest according to equity and good conscience before selling the minor’s assets or removing the minor’s assets beyond the limits of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-119

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-120.
Payment of funds or return of property to foreign conservator on minor’s behalf.

A person who is indebted to or has possession of tangible or intangible property of a minor may pay the debt or deliver the property to a foreign conservator of the minor. Payment of the debt or delivery of the property may be made upon proof that the foreign conservator has been appointed and is entitled to the debt payment or to receive delivery of the property.

Payment of the debt or delivery of the property in response to the demand discharges the debtor or possessor, unless the debtor or possessor has knowledge of proceedings for the appointment of a guardian, conservator, or other protective proceeding in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-120

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.